Ohio, session 136, HB150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4109.08, 4109.13, and 4109.99 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4109.08. (A) No minor shall be employed unless the employer keeps on the premises a complete list of all minors employed by the employer at a particular establishment and a printed abstract to be furnished by the director of commerce summarizing the provisions of this chapter. The list and abstract shall be posted in plain view in a conspicuous place which is frequented by the largest number of minor employees, and to which all minor employees have access. (B) An enforcement official may require any employer, in or about whose establishment an employee apparently under eighteen years of age is employed and whose age and schooling certificate is not on file with the director of commerce as required by section 3331.01 of the Revised Code, to furnish the enforcement official satisfactory evidence that the employee is in fact eighteen years of age or older. The enforcement official shall require from the employer the same evidence of age of the employee as is required by section 3331.02 of the Revised Code upon the issuance of an age and schooling certificate. No employer shall fail to produce the evidence. (C) Any employee apparently under eighteen years of age, working in any occupation or establishment with respect to which there are restrictions by rule or law governing the employment of minors, with respect to whom the employer has not furnished satisfactory evidence that the person is at or above the age required for performance of employment with the employer after being requested to do so, and who refuses to give to an enforcement official the employee's name, age, and place of residence may be taken into custody and charged with being an unruly child or other appropriate charge under Chapter 2151. or 2152. of the Revised Code. (D) No person shall, with the intent to assist a minor to procure employment, make a false statement by any means, including by submitting falsified forms electronically, to any employer or to any person authorized to issue an age and schooling certificate. (E) A school employee shall immediately report to the school's principal or the principal's designee when the employee is aware or has a reasonable suspicion based on specific facts that a person under sixteen years of age who attends the school is employed in a manner that violates section 4109.07 of the Revised Code. The principal or the designee shall report the knowledge or suspicion to the director of commerce. As used in this division, "school employee" has the same meaning as in section 3313.7112 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4109.13. (A) The administrator of the bureau of employment services director of commerce shall designate enforcement officials to enforce this chapter. (B) An enforcement official, upon discovery of a violation of this chapter and after notice to the employer, shall make a complaint against the offending employer in any court of competent jurisdiction. (C) Enforcement officials shall make complaint by filing a complaint before a court having competent jurisdiction against any person violating any law relating to the employment of minors. This section shall not be construed to limit the right of other persons to make those complaints. (D) County courts, municipal courts, and juvenile courts have jurisdiction to try offenses under this chapter. Juvenile courts have exclusive original jurisdiction to try offenses under section 3321.38 of the Revised Code. (E) No person or enforcement official instituting proceedings under this section shall be required to file or give security for the costs. If a defendant is acquitted, the judge before whom the case is brought shall certify the costs to the county auditor. The county auditor shall examine the amount and, if necessary, correct it. The county auditor shall issue a warrant on the county treasurer in favor of the persons to whom the costs are due. (F) Fines (F)(1) Except as provided in division (F)(2) of this section, fines collected for violations of this chapter and section 3321.38 of the Revised Code shall be paid into the funds of the school district in which the offense was committed. (2) The minor labor law enforcement fund is created in the state treasury. Fines collected pursuant to division (G) of section 4109.99 of the Revised Code shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. The director of commerce shall use the fund to administer and enforce this chapter. Sec. 4109.99. (A) Whoever violates section 4109.04, division (C) of section 4109.07, division (A), (B), or (D) of section 4109.08, section 4109.11, or division (B) of section 4109.12 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. (B) Whoever violates section 4109.05 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. (C) Whoever violates section 4109.03, division (A), (B), or (D) of section 4109.07, or section 4109.10 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the third degree on each subsequent offense. (D) Whoever violates division (A) of section 4109.12 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor for each day the violation continues. (E) Whoever violates division (A) of section 4109.21 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on a first offense and a first degree misdemeanor on each subsequent offense. If, however, the violation on a first offense contains aggravating circumstances, including, but not limited to, threats to a minor, reckless operation of a motor vehicle, or abandonment of or endangerment to a minor but not including circumstances that are the basis of a felony violation of section 2919.22 of the Revised Code, then the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted under this section and if the subsequent offense contains aggravating circumstances other than circumstances that are the basis of a felony violation of section 2919.22 of the Revised Code, then the person is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. (F) Whoever violates division (F) of section 4109.22 of the Revised Code shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to one thousand seven hundred thirty dollars for each violation. (G)(1) An employer that knowingly violates section 4109.07 of the Revised Code shall be fined fifty thousand dollars. (2) An employer who employs more than one person in violation of division (G)(1)of this section shall be fined separately for each person so employed. A fine under division (G)(1) of this section is in addition to any other penalty described in this section. Section 2. That existing sections 4109.08, 4109.13, and 4109.99 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. All items in this act are hereby appropriated as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. Section 4. 1 2 3 4 5 A COM DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 5AL1 800658 Minor Labor Law Enforcement $150,000 $150,000 D TOTAL DPF Dedicated Purpose Fund Group $150,000 $150,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $150,000 $150,000 MINOR LABOR LAW ENFORCEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 800658, Minor Labor Law Enforcement, shall be used by the Department of Commerce to hire staff necessary to enforce Chapter 4109. of the Revised Code pertaining to state law governing the employment of minors. On the effective date of this act, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $300,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Minor Labor Law Enforcement Fund (Fund 5AL1). Section 5. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of the main operating appropriations act of the 136th General Assembly. Section 6. This act shall be known as the Clock Out Kids Act.